	INTRODUCTION
1.1 BACKGROUND
Cybersecurity is an essential aspect of any online game as it ensures that player data is protected from unauthorized access and exploitation. In this context, cybersecurity refers to the practice of protecting the game's infrastructure, data, and users from cyber threats such as hacking, malware, and other forms of malicious activity. One of the main challenges in ensuring cybersecurity in games is that the game must remain accessible and enjoyable for players, while at the same time, protecting their information and preventing cheating or other forms of unfair play. To achieve this balance, game developers need to implement various security measures such as encryption, two-factor authentication, and secure login protocols. Another important aspect of cybersecurity in games is ensuring that players are aware of potential risks and how to protect themselves from them. This can involve educating players on how to create strong passwords, how to recognize phishing scams, and how to avoid downloading malware. Overall, cybersecurity is a critical consideration for any online game, and developers must take proactive measures to protect players' data and ensure a safe and enjoyable gaming experience
 
Figure 1.1: Types of cyber security threats related to online games [1].
1.2 PROBLEM STATEMENT
Cyber deception in video games is a growing concern as it can result in unfair gameplay, loss of player trust, and potentially damaging consequences such as identity theft and financial loss. Cyber deception refers to the practice of using malicious tactics to deceive players, gain unauthorized access to their accounts, or exploit vulnerabilities in the game's system. One of the main challenges in combating cyber deception in video games is the constantly evolving nature of the threat landscape. Hackers and cybercriminals are constantly developing new tactics and techniques to exploit weaknesses in games' security, making it challenging for developers to stay ahead of the curve and protect their players. Another challenge is that players themselves may unwittingly contribute to cyber deception by falling for phishing scams, downloading malware, or sharing personal information online. This highlights the need for player education and awareness campaigns to help them recognize and avoid these threats. Overall, cyber deception in video games poses a significant risk to both players and developers, and more needs to be done to prevent and mitigate these threats. This includes implementing advanced security measures, regularly updating software, educating players on how to protect themselves, and staying vigilant against emerging threats in the gaming landscape.
 
Figure 1.2: Number of game related threats detected by cyber security enterprises [3].
1.3 THESIS OBJECTIVES
The objectives of this topic are to provide guidance on building a cyber security system for video games and developing intrusion and theft detection methods. The main aim is to safeguard the game, its users, and its assets from various cyber threats.
The specific objectives for building a cyber security system for video games are:
	Conducting a risk assessment to identify potential threats and vulnerabilities.
	Defining security policies covering areas such as access control, data protection, threat detection, incident response, and user education.
	Implementing appropriate security controls, such as authentication and authorization mechanisms, data encryption, intrusion detection systems, and anti-virus software.
	Conducting regular security testing to identify any weaknesses or vulnerabilities in the system.
	Educating users on the risks associated with playing video games and how to protect themselves.
	Developing an incident response plan to enable the rapid response to any security incidents that occur.
The specific objectives for the dataset are:
	Compiling a collection of instances where a video game or its users have been targeted by cyber threats.
	Identifying common security threats and developing more effective security measures.
	Analyzing trends in video game cyber attacks and developing new strategies for detecting and mitigating these threats.
	Developing predictive models to anticipate future cyber threats to video games.
The specific objectives for developing an intrusion detection method for cyber threats in video games are:
	Defining threat scenarios to simulate different types of cyber-attacks and identify patterns and behaviors that may indicate an intrusion.
	Gathering data from different sources in the video game ecosystem, such as game servers, user profiles, network traffic logs, and system logs.
	Implementing a detection system that can analyze the data in real-time and identify potential intrusions using techniques such as signature-based detection, anomaly detection, or machine learning-based detection.
	Generating alerts to notify the appropriate security personnel or automated response system.
	Analyzing and responding to alerts appropriately, such as blocking the attacker's IP address, deploying countermeasures, or initiating an incident response plan.
	Regularly evaluating the performance of the intrusion detection system, updating the detection rules and algorithms, and adding new features as necessary.
The specific objectives for developing a theft detection scheme in video games are:
	Identifying the types of assets that are most likely to be stolen in video games, such as virtual currency, virtual items, or user data.
	Developing a detection system that can analyze user behavior and identify suspicious activities that may indicate theft.
	Generating alerts to notify the appropriate security personnel or automated response system.
	Analyzing and responding to alerts appropriately, such as freezing the user's account, revoking access, or initiating an incident response plan.
	Regularly evaluating the performance of the theft detection system, updating the detection rules and algorithms, and adding new features as necessary.
1.4 THESIS CONTRIBUTIONS
In this dissertation, we take into account the fact that the proposed framework includes organizations that operate within the law as well as those that operate outside of the law. When malicious users are present, the veracity of cyber educational games can be put in jeopardy, and as a result, the regular organizations that make up the framework could be damaged as a direct result of this. We model the issue as a game with only partial information and outcomes that are either zero or positive. We make the assumption in the game's design that our method uses machine learning to perform anomaly detection on all incoming data in order to identify any potential threats that do not fit a predefined pattern. This allows it to identify any potential threats that do not fit the pattern. Because of this, the proposed method is able to recognize any potential dangers that do not conform to the pattern.  Following this, we run a simulation of the game at its Nash equilibrium, which produces a game with a number of different strategies that are still viable options. An analysis of the results of the simulation is then used to determine the best response strategies that companies can use to experiment with in order to maximize the payoffs they receive. This is done in order to achieve the maximum possible benefit from the simulation. By utilizing the findings of the response strategy analysis that was discussed earlier, we are able to determine the most productive course of action that should be taken with regard to the proposed model. Because of this, we are in a position to make certain that the proposed method and other lawful enterprises, despite the existence of dishonest competitors, are able to continue to thrive and be successful.
1.5 THESIS STRUCTURE
The presented models have been utilized in all of the aforesaid implementation scopes of classification and have been compared to the related works in order to display the contributions of our models. The whole thesis put up with the below mentioned structure:
Chapter One: This chapter discusses introduction in the importance of cybersecurity in online games and the challenges faced by game developers in protecting players' data from cyber threats such as hacking and malware. The focus is on the growing concern of cyber deception in video games and the need for player education and advanced security measures to combat this threat. The objective of the thesis is to develop an educational game for cybersecurity that teaches players about cybersecurity concepts and best practices in an entertaining and immersive way, evaluates the effectiveness of the game in improving players' understanding and awareness of cybersecurity, and identifies areas where players may need additional education or support. The thesis also makes contributions by modelling the issue of cyber deception as a game with partial information and analysing the best response strategies that companies can use to maximize their payoffs and continue to thrive despite the existence of dishonest competitors.
Chapter Tow: The chapter discusses the impact of the internet on users' lives in various fields such as education, healthcare, entertainment, and commerce. It also emphasizes the significance of cybersecurity and the challenges that companies face in securing sensitive information. The paper highlights the limitations of traditional cybersecurity technologies such as firewalls and antivirus software and the need for quantitative analysis and decision making to tackle cyber threats. It also emphasizes the importance of thinking like a hacker to anticipate and counter cyber threats. The paper also references various studies that discuss the success of cryptography algorithms and the use of cyber forensic tools to maintain network security. Finally, the paper lists some of the most common types of cyber-attacks such as viruses, trojans, phishing, and ransomware
Chapter Three: This chapter discusses the background of the video game industry and the potential security risks associated with using the internet, despite recent security breaches. The age distribution of video gamers is presented graphically. The case study of ZeniMax Media, Inc. is used to highlight real-world security issues affecting the industry, and an initial security risk assessment is carried out. A comprehensive security strategy that includes information security audits, training programs, policies for system security, physical security measures, information assurance policies, and an incident response plan is proposed. The primary risk analysis and rating are also discussed.
Chapter Four: This chapter explains building a cybersecurity system for video games requires multiple layers of protection to safeguard against various cyber threats, including hacking, cheating, phishing, and malware. Steps to build an effective system include conducting a risk assessment, defining policies, implementing security controls, educating users, and developing an incident response plan. A dataset of video game security threats can be used to analyze trends, identify common threats, and develop predictive models to improve video game security.

Chapter Five: The chapter discusses conclusion and future works and the importance of cybersecurity in online games to protect player data from cyber threats such as hacking, malware, and unfair play. The article suggests implementing security measures like encryption, two-factor authentication, and secure login protocols. It also highlights the need for educating players on potential risks and how to protect themselves. The article further suggests developing and implementing an appropriate enterprise security plan tailored to the unique needs of each company. Lastly, it provides future recommendations to keep the cyber security educational game up-to-date, promote collaboration and community engagement, consider different learning styles, encourage continued learning, and incorporate real-world scenarios to remain effective and relevant.
	LITERATURE REVIEW
2.1 RELATED WORKS ON CYBER SECURITY
The Internet has had a significant impact on its users' lives for the better in a variety of ways due to the fact that it is present in such a wide variety of contexts. (e.g., commerce, entertainment, healthcare, education, e-commerce, banking, etc.). On the other hand, there is a significant drawback in terms of security as a result of the widespread occurrence of cyberattacks. 
In the recent past, there have been a few high-profile attacks in which hackers stole private information from systems that were connected to the internet and demanded payment in Bitcoin in exchange for the safe return of the information they stole. Steve Alpern et.al [5] showed that These hackers stole the information from systems that were connected to the internet. This is just one example of the significant problems that currently exist with regards to cyber security. After a hacker has successfully breached a system's defenses and gained access to it, he or she will have unrestricted access to any and all data stored on that system. Intruders pose a threat to the data's integrity, which, in turn, can compromise the data's accessibility as well as its privacy [2]. 
Nicola Basilico et.al [13] proved that it is possible that this will not be a significant problem for a small system that does not store any confidential information because it is possible that this will not affect the performance of the system. On the other hand, ensuring the security of sensitive data is a significant obstacle that large corporations must overcome. In today's highly competitive market, companies run the risk of not only losing customers but also their credibility if they share sensitive information with other businesses that are in direct competition with them. As a direct consequence of this, the significance of ensuring proper cyber security in the ongoing effort to thwart various security risks simply cannot be overstated. 
 
Figure 2.1: Threats related to cybersecurity.
Firewalls, intrusion detection software, and antivirus software have been the cornerstones of traditional cyber security technologies for many years. These technologies have been around for decades. These technological advancements have been available for quite some time.  In spite of the fact that they are helpful, one can only use them to protect oneself from a limited number of risks [2]. These more conventional methods have a few shortcomings, the most significant of which is that they do not involve quantitative analysis or the act of decision making. While this is going on, hackers are improving their skills and becoming more knowledgeable about the techniques they use to steal data. 
Melike Baykal-Gursoy et.al [16] stated that The ability to "think like a hacker" or "adversarial thinking" is widely regarded as the single most essential skill for researchers to possess, and there is widespread consensus among academics regarding this point. The phrase "think like a hacker" comes from the phrase "think like a hacker," which refers to the mindset of a computer hacker. Using this method, potential dangers can be warded off for any computer system that is connected to the internet. The ability to anticipate or understand the tactics used by an attacker is highly prized due to the fact that modern cyber defense relies heavily on attempting to do so. 
Before it became a buzzword, cyber security was a subject that had been the focus of extensive research for a considerable amount of time. The recent years have seen a meteoric rise in the incidence of cybercrime as a direct result of the fact that stealing information digitally is now much easier than it ever has been before. During the course of this quick discussion, we have touched on a few of the activities that were mentioned earlier in the sentence. The author of Paper [1] discusses the widespread use of both symmetric and asymmetric cryptography, as well as the success of the RSA algorithm in providing the level of security that was anticipated. The author of Paper [1] also discusses the success of the RSA algorithm in providing the level of security that was anticipated. This information is contained in the aforementioned paper, which you can access here. The many different types of cyber forensic tools that are used to determine the identities of criminals and to maintain network security are discussed in detail in paper [2]. The challenges that arise when attempting to maintain users' online safety while making use of innovative technologies are the primary subject matter of the paper [3]. The author of paper [5] conducts an in-depth investigation into the myriad of security issues that are plaguing today's most popular social networking sites in order to steal the identities of users and smear them in public. This is done in order for the author to steal users' identities and smear them in public. This investigation is being conducted with the intention of smearing users in public. The author has focused their investigation on the potential threats to data security that are posed by various social media platforms. They gained an understanding of the history of social networking sites that are available on the internet, how to classify them, as well as the many different types of cyber threats that are present today, as well as how to defend against them, and how they might develop in the future [3]. 
Vicki M Bier and Vinod Abhichandani [17] compared the most common threats that can affect both our computer system and the network that is utilized to disseminate information and facilitate data exchange between a variety of users. Both of these systems are used to distribute information and facilitate data exchange between one another. The following is a list of some examples of some of the most common types of attacks that hackers use in order to steal sensitive user data or to make changes to that data: 
A. Viruses 
The term "computer virus" refers to a piece of malicious software that, once it is activated, modifies other programs and inserts its own code into them in order to spread itself. This type of software is known as a computer virus. If the virus is able to successfully replicate itself and spread to new areas, the symptoms of infection will appear in areas that have already been infected. 
 
Figure 2.2: Symptoms of infected devices with viruses.
According to [14], computer viruses are responsible for a yearly economic loss that is measured in the billions of dollars. This is due to the fact that viruses have the ability to disrupt computer systems, waste resources, corrupt data, raise the cost of maintenance, and steal sensitive information. E-mail is one of the most effective methods for the transmission of viruses, along with instant messaging and file sharing. Your computer will become infected with the virus if you perform even just one of the following actions: open an attachment that was forwarded to you in an email; visit a website that has been compromised; download an executable file; or view an advertisement that has been compromised. In addition, infections can spread when a host computer is connected to a removable storage device (like a USB drive) that has also been infected. This is another way infections can spread from one computer to another. This is yet another method by which infections can be passed from person to person. Because viruses are able to easily avoid detection by security systems, they typically do not cause any problems once they have successfully compromised a system. This is because viruses are typically unable to cause problems after they have successfully compromised a system. If the security of the user's system is breached, the user may experience serious issues, such as the infection of other resources or system software, the modification or deletion of essential functions or applications, as well as the copying, deleting, or encrypting of data. These issues can cause the user to run into serious problems. Because of these problems, the user might have a less-than-desirable experience. 
B. Substantially, Type B, Trojan Horse 
A piece of malicious software that tricks the user into believing that it serves a purpose other than what it actually does is called a "Trojan horse." When an adversary sends a user an email that appears to be safe but in fact infects the user's system with malware, this is an example of the type of malicious software known as malware. It is possible to gain unauthorized access to a computer system through the use of a malicious computer program that is known as a Trojan horse. This program can also be used to steal sensitive data from a user, such as the user's banking credentials or passwords. Attacks that are carried out by ransomware frequently make use of Trojans as an additional vector. 
Stephen Boyd et.al [19] showed that There is a diverse collection of viruses that are capable of performing the functions of Trojan horses. It can be utilized in a wide range of applications, each of which can be utilized in a manner that is quite distinct from the others. Attackers and cybercriminals have the ability to target a particular user or to spread their preferred Trojan horse throughout the entire world.  
C. Adware and Spyware 
Adware, which is an abbreviation for "advertising supported software," can take many forms, including pop-up advertisements. If your computer is infected with adware, you may find that advertisements known as pop-ups start appearing on your screen without your permission. Adware has the capability to make changes to your home page, install spyware, and continuously inundate your device with advertisements. Adware is a more appropriate term to use when referring to potentially unwanted programs (PUPs), despite the fact that adware is a shorter term. It is not a virus in the strictest sense of the word, and in contrast to other pieces of malicious software, the goal of this particular piece of code may not be immediately clear. There should be no room for debate about the necessity of removing adware as soon as possible from any computer that already has it installed. Adware is one of the most annoying things that can happen whenever you use your computer, and it also has the potential to cause your system serious, long-term harm. Adware is software that secretly monitors your online activities and collects data from your browser in order to tailor the advertisements it displays to appear as though they were created just for you. This gives the impression that the advertisements were more relevant to you because they were created specifically for you. Adware infections are, at worst, nothing more than a minor source of annoyance. When you use the internet, for instance, being infected with adware will cause you to be inundated with pop-up advertisements, which will significantly slow down your experience and make it more difficult. Spyware is a type of software that secretly monitors a user's activity without the user's knowledge and then sends this information to malicious websites or advertising networks. Spyware is a type of software that monitors its users in secret, as its name suggests. These programs have the capability of monitoring the user's every keystroke (hence the name "keyloggers"), stealing sensitive information (such as passwords, credit card numbers, PINs, and other information of a similar nature), and accessing the user's inboxes. Spyware causes a computer to run more slowly, in addition to all of these other issues, which are listed below in figure 2.3:
 
Figure 2.3: Adware vs Malware vs Spyware.
D. An Attack Carried Out by a Go-Between or Middleman 
When an attacker poses as a third party in an online conversation in order to eavesdrop on private conversations and steal sensitive data, this is an example of a type of cybercrime that is known as a man-in-the-middle attack. Because of this, a malicious actor can read, send, and receive information that is meant for another person while remaining completely undetected. This is because the information is encrypted. The following illustration illustrates how a third party, also known as a man-in-the-middle (MITM) attacker, can eavesdrop on a conversation that is taking place between two people and steal information that is being exchanged by listening in on the conversation. 
Andrey Garnaev et.a; [36] proved that In order to steal money, the hacker is pretending to be both the victim and the bank at the same time. This deception is necessary in order to steal money. The following illustration demonstrates how information can be stolen during a conversation that is taking place between a client and a server as well as between two individuals. This conversation may also take place between a client and a third party. Both parties, in this hypothetical scenario, are led to believe that they are exchanging confidential information when, in fact, they are not. This is because an adversary has illegally obtained a public key and is using it to spoof the conversation. 
Even though encryption can be used to protect against man-in-the-middle attacks, a skilled hacker will still be able to redirect traffic to phishing websites that look like they are legitimate, or they will simply be able to forward traffic to its intended destination after recording it. 
Internet Viruses 
The term "worm" refers to a type of malicious software program that is capable of replicating itself and spreading to other computers while at the same time continuing to function normally on the computer that it has infected. In order to infect additional computers, a worm will copy itself and spread its copies. In order to replicate and spread themselves, worms frequently take advantage of aspects of an operating system that are not actively monitored and are kept out of sight. Worms are frequently not discovered until after their unchecked replication has caused severe disruption to the system and forced other operations to come to a halt. This is because other operations cannot continue while the worm is present. 
according to Ryusuke Hohzaki et.al It is not necessary in any way for the user to participate in the process in order for a computer worm to successfully replicate itself. All that needs to happen for the damage to be done is for the computer worm to start its destructive work on a computer system that has already been compromised. In the days before the widespread use of networks, computer worms were typically spread through infected storage media such as floppy diskettes. Today, however, networks are used almost universally. The worm had the capability of spreading to any other storage devices that were connected to the system that was being attacked once the infected media was mounted on the system. Even in this day and age, malicious software can spread easily through the use of portable storage devices, such as USB drives. 
E. Attacks Employing DOS and DDOS Techniques 
A denial-of-service attack, also known as a DoS attack, is an attempt to bring down a web server by overwhelming it with so many requests that it becomes unusable. This type of attack is also known as a denial-of-service attack. This indicates that the typical throughput of the website will either be slowed down to the point where it is unusable or completely halted for the entirety of the attack, depending on which scenario is more likely to occur. 
 The only distinction between a denial of service attack and a distributed denial of service attack (DDoS) is that the latter originates from a single location while the former originates from multiple locations simultaneously. Without the knowledge of their owners, thousands upon tens of thousands of zombie computers have the potential to launch a distributed denial of service attack. Botnets are networks of computers that have been compromised and are utilized by attackers because of their ability to be controlled remotely. Botnets can be used to launch distributed denial-of-service attacks. According to a number of studies, there are most likely tens of millions of computers spread across the entire planet that have been compromised by botnet software. 
Cybercriminals will use attacks that are known as denial-of-service (DoS) attacks to blackmail businesses into paying ransoms so that they can regain access to their websites. On the other hand, there have been instances in which perfectly legal businesses have paid Internet criminals to assist them in taking down the websites of their competitors. These businesses have done this in order to gain an advantage over their competition. Phishing and distributed denial of service attacks are frequently used in conjunction with one another by cybercriminals when they target customers of online banks. After launching a denial-of-service (DoS) attack against the bank's website, they move on to phishing emails in an attempt to trick customers into visiting a bogus emergency site. 
Recent occurrences have shown that distributed denial of service attacks (also known as DDoS attacks) are extremely profitable, and they are quickly gaining control of the Internet. Since 2005, the number of attacks that result in a distributed denial of service has apparently multiplied by a factor of one thousand, as stated in the Network Infrastructure Security Report. The largest attack that took place in 2010 was more than twice as large as the one that took place the year before; it bombarded its target at a rate of 100 GBit/s. This attack took place in the year 2010.
2.2 RELATED WORKS ON GAME THEORY AND CYBER SECURITY
Game theory and cyber security face many of the same challenges, many of which also apply to the latter. Many of these challenges are shared by both fields. A good number of these difficulties are also pertinent to the earlier situation. A reward system is said to be "asymmetrical" when a player's reward is not only dependent on his or her own choice, but also on the actions of the player they are competing against. This type of reward system may also depend on the player's own choices. Because game theory and cyber security share many similarities, it is possible to use game theory as a mathematical tool to address cyber security issues that involve the actions of multiple agents. This is made possible by the fact that game theory is similar to cyber security. In order to find answers to problems that arise in real time and in the real world, a significant number of researchers are concentrating their efforts on combining game theory and cyber security [3]. The use of game theory in the field of computer security is going through a period in which it is experiencing an exceptionally rapid expansion right now. 
A. Things That Should Be Considered in Their Totality The following is an excerpt from Game Theory [4]: 
The primary application of game theory is the study of cooperative and competitive settings that involve rational decision-makers. John von Neumann is widely regarded as the person responsible for the creation of game theory. It is always possible to devise a strategy that will allow you to emerge victorious from the game, regardless of the circumstances or the rules of the competition. This is because there is always something that can be done to improve one's chances of winning. There will be times when the actions taken by the opponent will determine whether or not these plans are successfully carried out as intended. The application of game theory could be of assistance to you if you want to maximize the benefits of rational decision making but are having trouble doing so on your own. 
The academic subfield that is known as "game theory" offers an explanation of how to conduct an analysis of the strategies utilized by multiple players in a game and determine the best way for each player to emerge victorious from the game. 
A list of the Sub-Components (B) that Game Theory is made up of can be found below: 
[4] Game theory can be broken down into its component parts, which are referred to as the players, strategies, actions, and payoff functions respectively.  
When a participant in a game is given the opportunity to make their own free decisions while they are engaged in gameplay, they are referred to as a "player" in that game. Players have the ability to choose how they want to progress through the game. Every person and every organization has their very own unique set of values and priorities that they hold most dear to their hearts. These are the things that they place the utmost importance on. The objective of the game is to secure the greatest possible benefit for each entity, which can be a single person, a group of people, or even a government. This goal can be accomplished by securing the greatest possible benefit. Accomplishing this objective can be done by achieving the highest possible score. 
The various steps that a player must take in order to accomplish their objectives are collectively referred to as "actions," and only one action is mentioned at a time in this context. All of the players are obligated to give serious thought to the various courses of action available to them before making their next move. Every player has the capability, in accordance with the theory of games, of accurately predicting the actions of the other players in the game that they are participating in. 
The benefits, or levels of fulfillment, that an individual experiences as a direct result of their participation in an activity are referred to as the "payoffs" for that activity. The "payoffs" for an activity are directly proportional to the level of success that the activity achieves. The result, which may be favorable or unfavorable depending on the decisions made by the player, will be determined by those decisions. The outcome may be favorable or unfavorable. After everyone who was playing the game has finished the last round, the winners of the competition are revealed and their prizes are awarded. 
Each player will be given their own individual and distinct set of predetermined actions to take, and these actions will be determined based on the actions that their opponent has taken in the past as well as the behavior that is expected from them. The term "strategies" refers to the overarching concept that encompasses all of these different action plans.  
The categorization of games (C): Games are able to be placed into a wide variety of different categories according to a wide variety of different criteria. There are a lot of different game categories. The following table provides a classification of games and describes the various safety concerns that are associated with each category. The table can be found following this paragraph. [2].

	MATERIALS AND METHODS
3.1 BACKGROUND OF VIDEO GAMES
At the present time, the video game industry is widely considered to be one of the most lucrative in all of the countries and regions of the world. The development of video games and the emergence of potential risks associated with using the internet have occurred simultaneously with the progression of technology. Even though it might not seem like there would be much of a problem with security risks in the video game industry, recent security breaches have demonstrated that this is not the case. This is despite the fact that it might not appear that there would be much of a problem with security risks. The security of a large number of well-known video game publishers has been compromised [1,] including Sony, Bethesda Softworks, EVE Online, Minecraft, and League of Legends, to name just a few.In addition, according to the most recent statistics, roughly 65 percent of American households have at least one video game console in their home. The demographics of video gamers show that the potential for security breaches is not limited to children, despite the fact that 65 percent of American households are susceptible to attack. 
3.1.1 Age Distribution of Players
The age distribution of people who play video games is depicted in Figure 3.1, which presents this data in graphical form. This article is based on a case study of a leading video game company so that readers can more easily relate to some real-world security issues that are affecting the video game industry. The purpose of the case study was to collect information that could be used in the article. A preliminary investigation into the effectiveness of the safety precautions was carried out after the case study had been chosen. This pertains to the software, hardware, and network infrastructure of the company in addition to any and all other aspects of the business. The implementation of information security audits, information security training programs, and policies for system security are the three essential components of comprehensive security that must be carried out. The missing piece is a strategy for ensuring the wellbeing of all involved parties. In the security strategy, the risks that the organization faces are described in great detail. This includes the risks themselves, the risks' priorities, the underlying causes of the risks, the controls that are currently in place, as well as the potential impacts that the risks could have. This document includes not only the potential implementation of physical security measures, but also information assurance policies and an incident response plan. This document contains not only the plan for implementation but also any potential roadblocks and potential fixes for those roadblocks. Also included in this document is the plan for implementation.
 
Figure 3.1: age distribution of player’s game.
3.2 A CASE STUDY ZENIMAX MEDIA, INC 
The company ZeniMax Media, Inc. will be the focus of the investigation that is known as a case study. They were chosen because they are currently regarded as one of the most prominent video game companies that can be found anywhere. This was a major factor in their selection. In addition to this, they are currently working on the production of "original interactive entertainment content for consoles, the PC, and handheld/wireless devices" [2]. [3] The case of ZeniMax Media Inc. is particularly instructive because it exemplifies the current state of the video game industry as a whole. This is due to the fact that almost all major game developers produce titles for at least one of those platforms. A selection of their most well-known works includes the following: 
Although Rockville, Maryland is home to the corporate headquarters of ZeniMax Media Inc. and the companies with which it is affiliated, the company also has offices in a number of other cities and countries across the world. Clients in the Benelux region, the United Kingdom, Germany, and France all have access to representatives who can answer their questions and provide assistance when needed. (Belgium, the Netherlands, and Luxembourg). Although ZeniMax Media Inc. may currently hold the position of market leader, the company was not the pioneer in this field when it came to the development of this industry. In point of fact, ZeniMax Media Inc. can trace its roots all the way back to 1986, which is the year that Bethesda Softworks was initially established as a company. Robert A. Altman's [3] appointment as Chief Executive Officer of ZeniMax Media began in the year 1999, when the company was still in its infancy. Since that time, it has grown to become one of the most prolific and successful game publishers in the industry, which has elevated its status to that of one of the most illustrious names in the industry. This paper will reveal the findings of an initial security risk assessment and will outline a comprehensive security strategy that will be implemented in stages in order to deal with the threats that have been identified. The purpose of this paper is to reveal the findings of an initial security risk assessment and will outline a comprehensive security strategy. 
3.3 ANALYSIS AND RATING OF THE PRIMARY RISK 
When developing a strategy to protect sensitive information, the first step that must be taken is to carry out a preliminary security assessment. This will help determine the level of risk that exists. It is absolutely necessary to take precautions against everything that could go wrong because there is no one source from which a company can be absolutely certain that it will be safe. This is due to the fact that there is no single source. Investigations have been conducted in a variety of domains. First, the vulnerabilities in the enterprise system are located, then those in the network, and finally, those in the software and hardware, in that order. If you try to save time and money during the information collection process in any one of these areas, you might end up with a poorly conceived security strategy. These areas include the following: It is essential to make an effort to locate any vulnerabilities in the security system, both now and in the future. It is also essential to make an effort to locate any vulnerabilities in the security system. Every single video game designer has their own one-of-a-kind set of concerns regarding the safety of their players, all of which need to be investigated and resolved in some way. 
 
Figure 3.2: Kaspersky analysis of cyber threats in video games.
The information used to compile the analysis that is presented below can be found pretty much anywhere on the internet, so feel free to look there if you're interested. The outcome of this investigation has been the derivation of concrete data regarding concrete configurations, settings, and security threats. Because of the manner in which the security assessment was carried out, the case study is shielded from any potential security risks that may come about as a result of the deployment of new business settings and configurations. This protection comes as a direct result of the preceding sentence. An investigation into the vulnerabilities that are present in business systems 3.1 Based on the findings of the preliminary investigation, it was determined that the enterprise's approach to gaining new customers constituted its most significant shortcoming. The process of mergers and acquisitions is essential to the expansion of any company, whether it be a video game company or another kind of business.The case study demonstrates that even though it is difficult to forecast the number of mergers and acquisitions that will occur in the video game industry, the activity will almost always concentrate on the most prominent publishers and developers in the industry. The current case study has already been involved in a number of acquisitions, including four that took place in the year prior to that and three that took place in the year prior to that. These acquisitions have already taken place. The integration of a significant number of separate systems during the acquisition process itself increases the likelihood that there will be security flaws. There is always the possibility that an organization's infrastructure will have its security compromised whenever new components from the outside are brought into the organization. At each and every stage of the buying process, there is always the possibility of a new security flaw being introduced. It is possible that domains will not be trusted, that excessive access will be granted, and that legitimate network traffic will be blocked. All three of these outcomes are possible. Additionally, there is a possibility that the new facility will house systems that are vulnerable to vulnerabilities that are both known and unknown at this time. This is a possibility that exists because there is a possibility that the new facility will house vulnerable systems. It is possible that some programs could be malicious, and it is also possible that some programs might not work properly with other programs. There is a practically infinite number of possible acquisitions, each of which poses its own unique set of threats to the organization's safety. The vast majority of game development studios run their operations on Microsoft Windows networks that are fully synchronized with active directory. The vast majority of businesses take care of their email management needs by logging into their accounts on an Exchange server. There is a potential for damage to occur as a result of the pervasive use of Microsoft Server operating systems, which are responsible for the operation of the vast majority of servers that are in operation at this time. There is a risk of there being security flaws if the systems are not patched on a regular basis. This increases the likelihood that there will be problems. It is not a good idea to blindly apply patches to servers because doing so could put your organization in greater danger by causing disruptions in production processes and applications or even crashing the servers themselves if the patch hadn't been thoroughly tested. This is the main reason why it is not a good idea to blindly apply patches to servers. Because of this, it is not a good idea to apply patches to servers without first doing some research. 
3.3.1 Server Intrusions
Using Microsoft servers comes with a number of drawbacks, one of which is the fact that the vast majority of viruses and other forms of malware that are currently circulating on the internet are designed specifically to target Microsoft platforms. This is just one of the many drawbacks that come with using Microsoft servers. The video gaming sector makes use of a diverse range of software, each of which may, from a security point of view, present its own individual set of challenges and flaws. The widespread use of software that is essential not only to the gaming industry but to any business that relies on computers is the first potential source of danger. This software is essential not only to the gaming industry but also to any business that relies on computers. 
 
Figure 3.3: server intrusion in video games.
This software is utilized in a variety of different game modes, including online and offline play. Applications such as Adobe PDF Reader, QuickTime, Adobe Flash, and the software suites associated with Microsoft Office are examples of some of the programs that are targeted most frequently. [4] Applications that are widely used and are frequently exploited as entry points can allow malicious code to infiltrate computers that are connected to the internet. This type of infection can occur frequently. Installing Microsoft Office and then improperly configuring it is one way to put a computer's security at risk. However, this is also true when installing any of the other programs on the computer. It is necessary to take additional safety precautions with Microsoft Office in order to prevent malicious macros and other types of code from automatically running. If certain security flaws in Microsoft Outlook, such as enabling attachments of specific file types in emails, etc., are allowed to remain unpatched and unchecked, then the data of users may be at risk. The vast majority of the program's security settings would be configured on the Exchange server, after which they would be broadcast to all clients. This would be the case for the vast majority of the program's security settings. Once identified, newly discovered exploits and vulnerabilities in other programs are typically made available to anyone who is aware of where to look for them. This is because of the nature of the discovery process itself. This procedure takes place on a somewhat consistent basis. This is done so that people and businesses can be ready for potential security threats, but it also provides hackers with useful information by demonstrating which vulnerabilities can be exploited and how. The main reason for doing this is so that people and businesses can be prepared for potential security threats. This is done to ensure that individuals and businesses are ready for any potential security threats that may arise. In conclusion, the programming language that is used to create the numerous different products that are sold in the video game industry presents a potential risk to the industry's security. These products include both software and hardware. This is something that every software developer must keep in mind, regardless of whether they specialize in making video games or something completely different. In the ISO/IEC TR 24772 [5,] it is stated that all programming languages contain constructs that are either inadequately specified, have undefined behavior, are dependent on implementation, or are difficult to use in the correct manner. This is because all programming languages contain constructs that are dependent on implementation. If software programs use those constructs, there is a chance that the programs will not function as intended, which can lead to vulnerabilities in the software. As a direct consequence of having these flaws, a system may become less secure or even open to attack as a direct result of having these flaws. The severity of the flaw will determine which of these consequences will occur. The fundamental premise is that every programming language has the potential to have flaws, but that these flaws typically lie not in the language itself but rather in the manner in which the code was written. This is because every programming language has the potential to have flaws, but this is because every programming language has the potential to have flaws. While this is true, it is important to note that every programming language has the potential for bugs. Enterprise systems may be susceptible to vulnerabilities and exposures as a result of network connectivity. 
3.3.2 Cisco Network Intrusions
The companies that make video games are able to use a diverse range of networking hardware, and they do so frequently. In most cases, these businesses utilize Cisco in addition to components produced by a variety of other companies. These networks are almost always constructed out of fully operational TCP/IP local area networks in the majority of cases. On the other hand, larger businesses may also have a wide area network (WAN) in place to connect their numerous offices that are located in different parts of the world. The company in question in this particular case study has its headquarters in Rockville, Maryland; however, the company also maintains additional offices in a variety of locations across the United States, as well as in Europe and Asia[6]. This particular case study was conducted in the United States. The connections between these various locations may not have sufficient security, which may also result in the introduction of new risks. Game developers and other types of businesses are able to make use of wide area networks (WANs) because there are several different ways in which security can be achieved over these networks. Through the use of a dedicated leased line, local area networks (LANs) and wide area networks (WANs) can be linked to one another [7]. This option for connecting wide-area networks (WANs) is not only the most pricey alternative, but it is also one of the most secure approaches available. The fact that it is also the most costly option contributes to the fact that it is the one that is selected the least frequently. One more primary method is for a company to connect all of its WANs to one another through the use of the internet. This is an increasingly common practice. If businesses go ahead and connect their wide area networks (WANs) to the internet, the security of their data may be put at risk if it is not protected by tried-and-true authentication and encryption methods, in addition to other precautions. 
 
Figure 3.4: WAN intrusions in CISCO servers.
The case study, much like any other large organization, possesses a variety of local area networks (LANs), all of which are connected to one another by a conventional switched network that makes use of virtual local area networks (VLANs). Additionally, there is the possibility that users will be able to access the site remotely. When an organization enables remote access, a virtual private network, also known as a VPN, is almost always put into place to protect the user from potential security risks. In that case, there is a possible vulnerability in the system's security that needs to be fixed as soon as possible. Each of these comes with its own unique set of dangers, which can range from minor to severe. However, the vast majority of these threats are ones that each and every network will eventually be forced to confront; they are merely a component of the vulnerabilities that networks present and must be accepted. There are many different kinds of security risks, some of which include a lack of secure safeguards like firewalls, incorrect configurations, or even the absence of an intrusion detection system or an intrusion prevention system. These are just a few examples of the many different kinds of security risks. In light of the recent vulnerabilities in security that have been uncovered, the significance of having a well-functioning intrusion detection system and/or an intrusion prevention system has come into sharper focus. [Cause and effect] An excellent illustration of this is the breach of security that took place at Sony in 2011. The breach in Sony's network security began on April 16, 2011, and lasted until April 19, 2011. It led to the disclosure of a wide variety of confidential data as a consequence.
Just the PlayStation Network (PSN) hack exposed sensitive data such as users' names, addresses (including city, state, zip code, and country), emails, gender, and birth dates, as well as their phone numbers, login names, and passwords that had been hashed [8]. On the other hand, there is a chance that the security breach would not have taken place at all if additional safety precautions had been taken at the same time as the installation of the intrusion detection system and/or the intrusion prevention system. On the other hand, they were using extremely out of date versions of the Apache software, which had not been patched and did not have a firewall installed. In addition, they had already reported these issues in an open forum that was being monitored by employees of Sony, but neither a response nor an update to the software had been provided to them at that time. These break-ins occurred somewhere between two and three months before that time period in question. This exemplifies how critical it is to always behave in a manner that is consistent with the security protocols that have been established. If preventative measures are not taken, such as installing security patches, it is possible for a company's reputation and revenue to be harmed. One example of this scenario is installing outdated software. Sony, being a large corporation, has the resources to deal with the fallout from this hack, whereas a business that is less well-off may not be able to do so due to lack of financial resources. Another aspect of business that calls for meticulous attention to detail is the acquisitions process. The network will need to be expanded after the completion of an acquisition in order to accommodate the increased volume of secure traffic going to and from the companies that were acquired. In order to allow users to safely access the system, it is necessary to first establish policies and configurations, in addition to mandating that each of these elements maintain a secure connection with one another. This is done to ensure that no unauthorized third parties can access the system in any way. Implementing or coming up with a method of acquisition that is generally recognized and accepted by everyone is one way to fix these issues, and it's something that can be done. One of the potential solutions involves delaying action until such time as it will be possible to establish a direct connection to each location in a capacity that is long-term. Establishing a connection between the locations through the use of a virtual private network (VPN) that is only active during certain times of the year is yet another possibility. On the other hand, each time this takes place, it poses a new risk to the integrity of the system, so it should be avoided at all costs. The conclusion of this conversation is that cybercriminals can gain access to video game companies through their websites. This is the main focus of this paragraph. The vast majority of the world's most well-known video game publishers maintain individual websites online for each of their numerous spinoff brands and individual games. This would imply that the websites themselves could be considered to be a potential risk to the safety of the users. 
 
Figure 3.5: WIPS security architecture.
This would be the first potential problem that could occur if the web servers were not located in a DMZ, which is the demilitarized zone. After that comes the actual construction of the pages themselves, which follows right behind. Every website that this company manages has the potential to expose the users' private information in some way. There are a variety of entry points for vulnerabilities in data security, such as java script injection, cross-site scripting, buffer overflows, and even the error messages themselves. Each of these entry points presents a unique risk to the system. If large databases are integrated without adequate security measures, then a hacker may be able to access the information that is contained within them. The number of vulnerabilities that can be exploited to gain unauthorized access to websites is continually growing. Possibilities in Enterprise-Wide Software Version 3.3 Both the software and the hardware that is used to create video games will come in a wide range of flavors thanks to the myriad of different studios that produce them. The relevant operating systems and server systems have already been covered by system security flaws, as have the risks associated with using Microsoft Office and Exchange. In addition, there are dangers associated with not having any backups to rely on. Even though they are unique to the case study, many of these are also among the most well-known in the video game industry as a whole. This is despite the fact that the case study itself is unique. Although it is true that each of these systems carries some degree of risk, a significant portion of that risk can be mitigated through the implementation of policies that are appropriate. This risk can be mitigated through the implementation of appropriate policies. The making of software and the development of video games may have some things in common, but the processes involved in making each are typically very different from one another. Computer and video games, on the other hand, can and do continue to run forever regardless of whether or not there is continuous participation from humans [10]. 
This is because once they have been launched, the vast majority of programs are static; this means that all actions require actions from human interaction. The reason for this is that once a program has been launched, it cannot change. On the other hand, the fundamental aspects of a video game are still developed with the assistance of the same programming languages that are utilized in the creation of various other types of software. There are a number of different programming languages that are used, including C++, C#, Java, and even Flash. The game engine is the next component that is indispensable to the overall experience of playing the game. The objective of a game engine is to hide as much of the complexity of rendering, physics, and input from the developer as is practically possible [11]. Graphic design, 3D design, programming, and audio are just some of the essential components that make up video games. Video games are made up of a lot of different parts that are all equally important. The video game industry makes extensive use of a wide variety of programs, such as Maya, 3DS Max, and Modo, in order to create the various aspects of the games that make up the product. In addition to that, the utilization of scripts is a very important component of the process.
Because of the reliance that video games are known for having on repetitive motions, the games would require a great deal more specialized coding in order to deal with these motions if scripts were not present. Scripts are what allow video games to have the reputation that they do.
 
Figure 3.6: Custom game development in MAYA 3D.
This category includes a wide variety of scripting languages, some examples of which include MaxScript, MELScript, and PythonScript. The lightning-fast development of a vast number of specialized applications has thrown open the door to the prospect of unintended consequences. The script programs could be used to run powerful automated commands that are essential to the gaming industry; however, programming languages have security issues due to insecure coding practices. The script programs could be used to run powerful automated commands that are essential to the gaming industry. These problems could be exploited to carry out significant automated commands. Some of the programs that can be built with each of these languages have security flaws, and those flaws can spread throughout an organization wherever those programs are used. Some of the programs that can be built with each of these languages contain security flaws. There is also the possibility that the flaws are inherent to the language itself. The majority of the time, there is only one primary location where everyone can be found together.
Every video game company has a website, and each one of those websites incorporates aspects of the internet. A security breach occurred not too long ago in one of the ad hoc extensions of the case study. This serves as an excellent illustration of the difficulties that can be encountered with website safety and serves as an excellent illustration of the difficulties that can be encountered with website security. According to Bethesda [12], unauthorized individuals gained access to the publisher's websites and stole user names, email addresses, and/or passwords. This information was taken from the websites. A few pieces of personal information were harvested directly from their website, but none of their financial data was taken. The method that was probably used to accomplish this objective was connecting the sites to a database that was probably hosted on Microsoft's SQL server or on SharePoint. This was probably the method that was used. Either of these two database management systems is employed by the vast majority of the most important companies operating in the modern era. When it comes to the actual manufacturing of video games, the industry as a whole relies on a diverse selection of software in order to get the job done. For the purpose of, say, developing a video game, each of the grants that are a part of the case study might use their very own one-of-a-kind collection of tools. There are the tools that can be utilized in the process of developing 3D software. Some examples of these tools include the ones that were presented initially. In addition to that, there are the programming languages, of which only a select few have been discussed so far. In addition to this, each of the plethora of different console platforms calls for its own particular forms of code. Each of the video game consoles, PlayStation and Xbox, utilizes its own specialized programming language in order to function. Threats to the Physical Elements That Make Up Enterprise Systems There is a possibility that various video game publishers utilize a variety of computer platforms in their production process. On the other hand, servers can be sourced from a wide variety of different manufacturers, such as IBM, HP, or Dell, amongst others. In this particular instance, we have found that the vast majority of the servers are produced by Dell, although there are a few computers produced by HP thrown in there for good measure. The majority of these computer retailers sell servers with warranties that cover the cost of replacing broken components. This is the reason why this is the case. Because of this, the likelihood of a piece of hardware failing within an organization is lower than it would be otherwise. Uninterruptible power supplies, also known as UPSs, are necessary for the protection of workstations and servers. However, if a UPS fails to function properly, the hardware that is housed within the servers and workstations is at risk of being damaged by power surges and brownouts. The video game industry makes use of a huge variety of different kinds of workstations, so employees never have to settle for the same thing twice. There is a possibility that the kind of work being done by the employee ought to have some bearing on the decision regarding the system. It's possible that only the artists and animators who work in three dimensions will use Apple computers instead of any other brand. Everyone else on the team, including the office staff and the programmers, will have to make do with regular personal computers. In this particular research project, computers made by Dell are used in almost every aspect of the investigation. Because the overwhelming majority of these personal computers are all of the same model, the process of distributing a standardized and protected image to each and every one of them can be simplified as a result. If employees were required to use any one of several different models of workstations, the company would be putting itself in a position where it could be at risk. When employees are granted access to either standardized workstations or a large number of individual workstations that are dispersed across the company, the risk of a security breach is decreased. These two options are both available across the organization. Administrators are able to ensure that all of their computers are running with the most recent software and are properly configured if they make use of standardized images. This is possible because administrators are able to ensure that all of their computers use the same image.
 3.4. SECURITY PREREQUISITES 
The results of the information security audit highlight the significance of developing and enforcing standards and policies, as well as developing and establishing an extensive information security training program. All of these are essential steps that must be taken in order to protect sensitive data. These will serve as an effective first line of defense and be able to supply the training programs with the necessary safety precautions. They will also be able to function as an effective first line of defense. Since it has been demonstrated time and again that these are the most effective requirements for system security, every single company that is a part of the video game industry ought to put all of these into practice.
3.4.1 Safety Measures to Consider 
When Working with the System Developing system-specific security policies is the first thing that would have to be done in order to get the system up and running again. An Enterprise Information Security Policy (EISP), an Issue-Specific Security Policy (ISSP), and a Systems-Specific Policy are the three policies that should be developed and put into place in the first and foremost place. (SSP). (SysPS). Having an enterprise information security policy in place is absolutely necessary for a company to protect the integrity of its systems, and this requirement takes precedence over any other requirement. "an overview of the corporate philosophy on security" [13] is what the readers are going to get out of this document, which is why it was written. Security In addition to this, it is a method for outlining the various roles and responsibilities that must be assumed by each company in order for there to be a safe environment. This must be done in order to ensure that there is a safe environment. This is of the utmost importance for larger companies because of the greater need to assign roles and responsibilities in advance at those businesses. 
 
Figure 3.7: Safety measure to consider in video games.
3.4.2 Potential Risks
To name just a few of the potential areas of concern, a problem-oriented security policy can address concerns such as authorized access, usage of equipment, and even management of the systems themselves.  These are all distinct problems that need to be fixed in their own right and can be fixed in a manner that is independent of one another.  Every game developer ought to give serious thought to these important guidelines for the industry of video games, and they should be followed. Guidelines for things like email and internet use could potentially be included in this document, in addition to any necessary minimum settings. This document could also include any necessary minimum settings. In conclusion, it is necessary to establish guidelines for the use of social networking sites.  This is of the utmost importance in the modern era, when a variety of social media platforms are incorporated into each and every aspect of the video game industry. 
The system-specific policies have the potential to have an extremely broad range of application scopes. There is a possibility that the specifications will be of a technical nature; alternatively, they might be drafted in order to offer management some guidance.  In a nutshell, these SysPSs would deal with everything that needs to be dealt with in the same manner across all companies.    When taken together, these three recommendations ought to provide adequate protection for any video game developer.  In the event that any of these do in fact exist, it will be necessary for each of them to be customized to meet the requirements of each specific video game publisher, in addition to the requirements of the systems they use and the subsidies they receive. 
3.4.3 Online Education and Protecting Electronic Information 
Lessons on how to maintain confidentiality of sensitive data are going to be the next logical addition to the curriculum.  The development of training programs ought to be primarily conducted with these three primary pillars serving as the foundation.  The overarching concept of security is supported by its three individual pillars, which are namely, awareness, education, and training.  These would each focus on a distinct facet of the business operations carried out by the company.   
It is absolutely necessary to educate employees on the organization's security policies due to the fact that these policies are crafted according to the financial constraints of the organization. Workers who have received training in security will have improved abilities to identify threats, assess those threats, and take preventative measures against those threats as a result of the training.  The staff members are then instructed, as part of the security-awareness training, on how to identify potential threats and devise strategies for mitigating those threats. Concerns about the security of e-mails in general, as well as more specific issues, such as those pertaining to software and programming, could be categorized as falling under this category's purview.  
3.4.4 Threats Facing Information Security
The regulations that govern information security include one final component, which is audits of the safety precautions that are currently being implemented.  These are essential not only for ensuring the success of the policies that were previously discussed, including those that have been designed as well as those that have been put into place, but also for achieving this level of success. They are essential for both.  It would be impossible to determine whether or not security controls and policies were being followed in the event that a security breach occurred first, which is why routine reviews are an absolute necessity.  If we wait until then, it will be too late to do anything about it, so we might as well avoid doing that. 
There are a wide variety of approaches that one can take when it comes to performing an audit of the information security measures that have been put in place.  A common type of log to keep is one that simply records successful and unsuccessful attempts to access the network and any other crucial areas.  It is possible to demonstrate that workers are making use of the information that was presented in the training by giving them a test, using other types of methods, such as requiring them to submit a report, and so on. One way to do this is to demonstrate that they are using the information that was presented in the training.  In general, this can be accomplished through the application of a variety of different strategies, some of which are dependent on the particular policies and training programs that have been put into place. 
 
Figure 3.8: General security policy for video games.
3.5 EDUCATIONAL IMPORTANCE 
Training is a component that is regarded as being of utmost significance in the video game industry.
Two of the most common types of employee education are teaching workers to exercise caution with their passwords and instructing workers on how to navigate the internet safely from their places of employment, both of which fall under the category of potential security risks.  Despite the fact that these two things are the bare minimums that any company ought to have in place, the importance of them cannot be overstated.  If the users have not first been given some kind of training, it will be difficult to guarantee their safety while they are at work.   
The next step is to educate workers on the significance of security and teach them how to respond appropriately to a security breach. This should be done as soon as possible after step one.  In addition to this, particular instructions for ensuring the security of the acquisitions should be included in this document.  If you do either of these things, you will gain a better understanding of the significance of information security and some of the skills you will need to respond securely in the event of an emergency. If you do either of these things, you will also gain some of the skills you will need to respond securely in the event of an emergency.  In addition to this, individuals should be educated in the skills necessary to recognize potential threats to security. Employees are the first line of defense, and the only way to ensure their safety and keep them out of harm's way is to educate them on how to recognize potential hazards. This is the only way to keep them out of harm's way. 
In addition, programmers need to be instructed in how to use secure coding practices and even better coding methods so that the software that they create is as secure and free of bugs as is humanly possible. When working with the source code of a program, it is all too easy to open a backdoor in a network, either by accident or on purpose. This can be a security risk. Because of this, it is imperative that this particular point be kept in mind. Companies in the video game industry can protect the authenticity of their products and guarantee the satisfaction of their customers by providing their programmers with security training at every stage of product development and distribution. 
3.5.1 The Provision of Resources for Pedagogical Purposes
It is possible and even encouraged to draw training materials from a number of different sources because of the diverse workforce that is employed in the video game industry. This is done so that the industry can better meet the needs of its customers.  First, if a company and its subsidiaries are dispersed across the globe like the one in the case study, there needs to be a way for all of the employees to complete the training regardless of where they are physically located. This is one of the requirements that must be met. This criterion has to be satisfied in order to proceed.  It was decided that a good way to train employees would be to provide them with access to materials for self-guided learning or to a centralized online training hub that all employees could use. Both of these options were considered to be good ways to train employees. Both of these possibilities were considered to be viable methods for completing this assignment.  This is not something that will be beneficial to all training programs, but an excellent example of where it could be useful is in teaching employees to be cautious with their passwords and email accounts.  All of these general guidelines ought to be made known to the workers, and they ought to become familiar with them.  Video content and email newsletters are two additional options that may be taken into consideration. 
 
Figure 3.9: Educational aspects of developing a video game.
Some of the more specialized classes that would be introduced, such as one on programming securely, might be taught in the conventional manner by making use of lectures in a classroom setting like you would find in a school today.  As a consequence of this, there is a greater emphasis placed on gaining knowledge through practical experience, which typically leads to improved memorization.  The format of the lecture allows workers to not only ask in-depth questions, but also benefit from the knowledge sharing that takes place between workers. This knowledge sharing has been demonstrated to be beneficial to other workers.  In the event that it is not possible to hold a lecture at each workplace, it may be possible to hold it in a virtual classroom. In this setting, participants and the instructor will be able to communicate with one another in private.    
3.6 Dangers to the Existing video games 
Both the production of new video games and the installation of new computer systems carry the possibility of exposing an organization to new software and hardware security vulnerabilities, which in turn exposes the organization to a wide range of dangers.  Because each of these presents a distinct danger to the business, it is essential to rank them and deal with them in the order that makes the most logical sense given the circumstances of the situation. Only then will it be possible to properly address all of the potential issues. 
In the event that any of these occurrences take place, it will be necessary to react in a manner that is specific and clearly defined in the event that we want to avoid any confusion.  You absolutely need to have a plan for responding to incidents in light of the current situation.  The recommendations that follow provide an outline of some general things that ought to be kept in mind as well as actions that ought to be taken in the event that there is an emergency.  Due to the fact that they are abstract, it is possible to reshape them so that they are applicable to any circumstance due to their malleability. 
3.6.1 Adding New Information to The Game
"Users of information services are required to note and report any observed or suspected security weaknesses in or threats to systems or services immediately upon observation," [14] as stated in the first rule of the set. The Information Security and Privacy Act includes this particular regulation. (ISP Act). 
Second, users shouldn't take any action until an information technology (IT) or security expert verifies that an incident has actually occurred before they do anything else. 
An information technology or cyber security professional will be brought in to investigate the incident and produce a report that details the cause of the incident, the severity of the incident, and the impact it is currently having on the company.  
Fourth, after the initial data have been recorded, a response and a mitigation plan can be developed for each individual incident that has occurred.  
The IT and security teams' next step, once an incident has been brought under control, is to document the actions they took to put things back in order. This step is the next step after the incident has been brought under control. 
Sixth, after you have gathered all of the pertinent data, you should conduct an analysis to determine how the particulars you have gathered can either inform future responses to incidents or how the risk can be reduced even further. This should be done right away after the data collection has been completed. 
3.6.2 Adjustments to Prevent Dangerous Interactions with Other People 
After that, we will discuss any additional measures of physical security that ought to be included as a component of this overall plan as soon as we have finished with the previous topic.  If the server rooms have not already been outfitted with physical security measures, those areas should be the first to receive them if they have not already been done so. Each and every data center needs to have fully functional environmental controls installed in the server room in order to maintain a temperature that is suitable for the equipment housed there.  Any structure that houses servers must have fire suppression systems installed, and these systems must be designed specifically for data centers. These systems must also be up to date with the latest safety standards. When it comes to protecting sensitive electronic equipment and the machinery found in server rooms, automatic fire suppression systems that make use of carbon dioxide are an excellent option. Carbon dioxide "extinguishes a fire by removing its supply of oxygen," [15] and as a result, this makes it a superior method to use around electronic devices in comparison to others that could cause damage to them. On the other hand, if somebody were to be in the room when it went off, there is a chance that they would suffocate due to the lack of oxygen in the room. This is a possibility.  This makes it possible to install personal oxygen tanks or other protective measures in the event that a person gets trapped in the server room when an alarm goes off. Other examples of this include:  The remaining buildings need to be outfitted with water purification methods that have been proven to be effective in order to protect the health and safety of the workers. 
The following step would involve installing a security alarm system that is equipped with motion sensors and live feed cameras in every one of the server rooms, in addition to any other locations that are regarded as being essential.  These live-feed cameras should be continuously recorded as well as monitored by a trained security guard around the clock. Utilizing an intelligent uninterruptible power supply, also known as a UPS, is an additional example of a physical security measure. In the event of a brownout, spike, or unexpected shutdown, this would protect the servers from power fluctuations, which are known to corrupt or otherwise damage the data that is stored on them.   
The last part of the physical security system would be for all of the workers to wear badges that are equipped with programmable smart chips. The physical security system would be finished off with the addition of these chips, which would let users into areas where they have been given permission to be. In addition to using these badges or key cards, users will be required to change the passwords that secure their accounts every three months. This requirement is in place to further increase security.  In addition, the badges offer an additional layer of security on top of the standard password, which is utilized by the vast majority of individuals and businesses today.  They will be required to have them in order to enter restricted areas of certain buildings and use computers that can only be accessed through the use of key cards. Users are also obligated to clearly display their badges at all times while they are on the premises of the facility.  Should they misplace it, they will be unable to log into the network or any of the other secure areas where they are required to be in order to perform their jobs. 
3.6.3 Protection of Confidential Information 
There are a few things that need to be figured out first before any company that makes video games can implement information assurance policies that can be relied upon. This is true for any company that makes video games.  Utilizing redundancy is one of the approaches that can be taken.  By putting a RAID 5 array in each of the servers, we can take the first step toward making these systems more reliable in case of an outage. Initial redundancy is created as a result of the fact that, in the event that one of the drives fails, another drive that is still functioning can be used to replace the one that is faulty, thereby ensuring that the system continues to operate normally. Because it ensures that their systems can continue to operate for the greatest amount of time possible, this is essential for the continued success of any business that deals in video games. This is because it ensures that their systems can continue to function for the maximum amount of time possible.  Even in the event that one of the drives in a RAID 5 array fails to function properly, the array can still perform normally. 
The second strategy calls for the establishment of multiple data centers, each of which houses multiple copies of servers that are identical to one another.  When it comes to servers, domain controllers have a greater possibility than any other type of having a duplicate than any other kind. It is essential to have a backup domain controller accessible at each and every one of the crucial locations.  In order for users to successfully log into the system, they do not need to be concerned with which domain controller is being used for authentication.  In addition to that, it is possible to copy an entire file system over to another location.  Not only is it necessary to make a backup copy of the data, but redundancy can also be achieved by making it so that more people have access to the data in the event that the network connection at the primary location is severed. Redundancy can be accomplished by storing the source files in two separate locations.  Something could always go wrong, which would prevent communication from taking place between one facility and the others. This is something that can never be completely ruled out.   
The implementation of a reliable backup system is the final step in the plan that will be followed.  Before beginning the process of putting in place a backup solution, it is strongly suggested that the data be correctly organized into categories. It will be possible to choose backups once the data has been properly categorized into the appropriate categories.  On the other hand, it is absolutely necessary to run a full back up at least once every week.  During the course of the week, incremental and differential copies will be made at various points in time, and these copies will be saved.  The primary focus of differential backups could be on essential data that requires prompt restoration, whereas the primary focus of incremental backups would be on secondary data that can be restored after the primary data has been backed up. Both incremental and differential backups come with a set of benefits as well as drawbacks. Choosing the right method is essential.   
A safe distance away from the primary location of the company is where all of the incremental and differential backups, along with at least three full backups, should be stored on a weekly basis. These locations should be fireproof.  It is recommended that one of the full backups be transported off-site once a month and kept in a vault that is both climate-controlled and fireproof. Even in the event that a disaster strikes a single location and renders that location's backups inaccessible, the long-term vault will continue to store copies of vital data even after the disaster has occurred. 
All of these backups have to be executed by the qualified staff members who are stationed at the primary server sites.  It will be up to the roles that have been assigned to ensure that the backups function as expected and to incorporate any new data that needs to be backed up into the weekly cycle. These responsibilities will fall under the purview of the roles that have been assigned.  In addition to this, they will be responsible for managing the backup tape storage facilities that are located both on-site and off-site. 
Develop your strategies for getting the process of implementation started. 6.5 In order to successfully implement these plans across the board, any video game company that wants to do so must first determine all of the potential roles that will be involved throughout each implementation. This is necessary in order to proceed further.  As soon as the responsibilities that have been assigned have been made clear, it is the responsibility of management to ensure that all relevant staff members have received the training that will enable them to effectively implement these strategies. This training should be provided as soon as the responsibilities that have been assigned have been made clear.  At the end of the day, it will be the responsibility of the Chief Information Officer, who is also referred to as the CIO, to make certain that each new procedure and policy is tailored to the specific requirements of each video game company.  The manager as well as the IT team both play important roles in ensuring that all employees are working together in an effort that is both effective and efficient to implement the plans. This is to ensure that the plans are carried out successfully.   
When the division of labor has been finalized, the next step is to take a comprehensive inventory of the current state of each location as well as the physical security measures that are already in place. This should be done as soon as possible after the division of labor has been finalized.  If employees are aware of the different types of assets that are already in place as well as where they are located, then new security plans and policies can be tailored to meet the specific requirements that are necessary for each individual company.  
3.6.4 Obstacles That Get in The Way of Game Security 
The acquisitions are the factor that most significantly raises concerns about the practicability of this security plan.  When you make a new purchase, a completely new set of network connections will be established to accommodate the new device. Significant changes will need to be made to the configurations of some networks before they can successfully collaborate in a secure manner with other networks. This will allow for the networks to work together with others. It will be difficult to convince the staff to adopt the new policies and procedures if they run counter to the standards that have already been established.  The unwillingness of workers to adapt to new ways of doing things is a typical obstacle that can be discovered in the workplace. They will do everything in their power to stay the same and will select the option that will put them in the position of having the fewest number of challenges possible. 
 
Figure 3.10: Three pillars of video game cyber security.
The provision of education and training to the staff on any changes that may take place is a primary solution to these potential hurdles that may arise.  Incentives could be provided to individuals in order to encourage them to comply with the new security plan as it is being implemented as a second possibility.  The final step in overcoming this obstacle is to finish as much preparatory work for any future mergers or acquisitions of new businesses as is humanly possible. This step is the final step in overcoming this obstacle. When there is a complete inventory, the people who are responsible for the various items can decide whether or not those items can be used together, and they can also determine whether or not any of the items need to be culled. This is possible because they are able to determine whether or not those items are compatible with one another.  Even though these aren't even close to being all of the possibilities, keeping them in mind can help ease the blow when you run into unexpected roadblocks along the way
PROPOSED METHOD
4.1 SYSTEM OUTLINE
Building a cyber security system for video games is a complex and multifaceted process that involves several layers of protection to safeguard the game, its users, and its assets from various cyber threats. This system should be designed to protect against a range of cyber-attacks, including hacking, cheating, phishing, and malware, among others. To build an effective cyber security system for video games, there are several steps that should be taken: Conduct a risk assessment: A comprehensive risk assessment should be conducted to identify the potential threats and vulnerabilities that the game and its users face. This assessment should take into account the game's architecture, data flows, user behavior, and any third-party services that are integrated with the game. Define security policies: Based on the results of the risk assessment, security policies should be defined that outline the measures that will be taken to protect the game and its users. These policies should cover areas such as access control, data protection, threat detection, incident response, and user education. 
4.1.1 Implement Security Controls
Once the security policies have been defined, appropriate security controls should be implemented to enforce these policies. These controls can include measures such as authentication and authorization mechanisms, data encryption, intrusion detection systems, and anti-virus software. Conduct regular security testing: Regular security testing should be conducted to identify any weaknesses or vulnerabilities in the system. This testing can include techniques such as penetration testing, vulnerability scanning, and code reviews. 
4.1.2 Educate Users
Users should be educated on the risks associated with playing video games and how to protect themselves from these risks. This education can include topics such as password hygiene, avoiding phishing scams, and reporting suspicious activity. Monitor and respond to incidents: Finally, an incident response plan should be developed to enable the rapid response to any security incidents that occur. This plan should include procedures for incident detection, containment, and recovery. Overall, building a cyber security system for video games is a complex process that requires a multi-layered approach. By conducting a thorough risk assessment, defining security policies, implementing appropriate security controls, conducting regular security testing, educating users, and developing an incident response plan, game developers can help ensure that their game is protected against cyber threats.
4.2 DATASET
A dataset of video game security threats would consist of a collection of instances where a video game or its users have been targeted by cyber threats. This dataset could include various types of security threats, such as hacking attempts, DDoS attacks, phishing scams, malware infections, and cheating or exploitation of game mechanics. Each instance in the dataset would likely include information such as the type of threat, the target game, the date and time of the attack, the severity of the attack, and any mitigating measures that were taken in response. Additional information could include the method of attack, the identity of the attacker, and any impacts on the game's users or assets. The dataset could be compiled through various means, such as through reports from game developers or security researchers, news articles, or user reports. It could also include data from third-party services that specialize in monitoring and detecting cyber threats to video games, such as gaming-specific cybersecurity firms or game server providers. This dataset could be used in various ways to enhance video game security. For example, game developers could use the dataset to identify common security threats and develop more effective security measures. Security researchers could use the dataset to analyze trends in video game cyber attacks and develop new strategies for detecting and mitigating these threats. Additionally, the dataset could be used to develop predictive models to anticipate future cyber threats to video games, allowing for proactive security measures.
 
Figure 4.1: Flood attack dataset description
4.3 INTRUSION DETECTION 
Developing an intrusion detection method for cyber threats in video games involves implementing a system that can detect and respond to potential security breaches in real-time. The following are some steps that can be taken to develop an intrusion detection method for cyber threats in video games: Define Threat Scenarios: Identify potential security threats that your video game may be vulnerable to, such as cheating, DDoS attacks, malware, or data theft. Define different threat scenarios to simulate different types of cyber-attacks and to identify patterns and behaviors that may indicate an intrusion. 
 
Figure 4.2: The proposed IDS for the video game
Gather Data: Collect data from different sources in your video game ecosystem, such as game servers, user profiles, network traffic logs, and system logs. This data can be used to train machine learning algorithms to detect intrusion attempts and to improve the accuracy of the detection system. Implement a Detection System: Develop and implement a detection system that can analyze the data in real-time and identify potential intrusions. This system can use techniques such as signature-based detection, anomaly detection, or machine learning-based detection to identify potential threats. 
Generate Alerts: Once an intrusion attempt has been detected, the detection system should generate an alert to notify the appropriate security personnel or automated response system. Analyze and Respond: Analyze the alert to determine the severity and type of intrusion attempt and respond appropriately. The response may include actions such as blocking the attacker's IP address, deploying countermeasures, or initiating an incident response plan.
 Evaluate and Improve: Regularly evaluate the performance of the intrusion detection system, update the detection rules and algorithms, and add new features as necessary. In conclusion, developing an intrusion detection method for cyber threats in video games involves defining threat scenarios, collecting data, implementing a detection system, generating alerts, analyzing and responding, and evaluating and improving. By implementing a comprehensive intrusion detection system, game developers can help ensure that their games and user data are protected against potential cyber threats.
4.4 THEFT DETECTION
A theft detection scheme in video games aims to prevent or detect in-game asset thefts, such as stolen virtual items or in-game currency. Developing a theft detection scheme involves implementing a system that can identify and respond to potential thefts in real-time. The following are some steps that can be taken to develop a theft detection scheme in video games: Identify Assets to Protect: Identify the in-game assets that are most valuable and susceptible to theft, such as rare or high-value items, virtual currency, or personal information. Implement Access Controls: Implement access controls to restrict access to these assets to authorized users only. This may include two-factor authentication, IP address blocking, or other security measures. Monitor Asset Transactions: Monitor transactions related to these assets, such as item trades or virtual currency exchanges, to detect potential thefts or suspicious activity. Implement Behavioral Analysis: Analyze player behavior to identify patterns that may indicate potential thefts. For example, sudden spikes in asset transfers or unusual transaction patterns may indicate a theft in progress. Implement Alerts and Response Mechanisms: Develop and implement an alert system to notify security personnel or automated response systems when a potential theft is detected. This system should be able to respond quickly and automatically to potential thefts. Evaluate and Improve: Regularly evaluate the performance of the theft detection system, update the detection rules and algorithms, and add new features as necessary. In conclusion, developing a theft detection scheme in video games involves identifying valuable assets, implementing access controls, monitoring asset transactions, analyzing player behavior, implementing alerts and response mechanisms, and regularly evaluating and improving the system. By implementing a comprehensive theft detection scheme, game developers can help protect their games and their players against in-game asset thefts.
 
Figure 4.3: the proposed Theft detection scheme.
4.5 SQL INJECTION DETECTION
SQL injection attacks are a common type of cyber attack where an attacker injects malicious SQL statements into a web-based application to gain access to sensitive data or perform unauthorized actions. SQL injection attacks can also occur in video games that use web-based applications, such as those that use a web interface for game management or those that allow players to trade items or engage in other transactions. Developing an SQL injection detection scheme in video games involves implementing a system that can detect and prevent these types of attacks. The following are some steps that can be taken to develop an SQL injection detection scheme in video games: Implement Input Validation: Implement input validation to ensure that all user input is validated before being passed to the database. This includes input validation for all user interactions, such as login attempts, item trades, or other transactions. Use Prepared Statements: Use prepared statements instead of dynamically generated SQL statements to ensure that user input is properly sanitized and prevent SQL injection attacks.
 
Figure 4.4: SQL injection attack implemented on the proposed game.
Monitor Database Activity: Monitor database activity to detect potential SQL injection attacks in real-time. This may include monitoring for suspicious SQL statements or unusual database activity. Implement Alerts and Response Mechanisms: Develop and implement an alert system to notify security personnel or automated response systems when a potential SQL injection attack is detected. This system should be able to respond quickly and automatically to potential attacks. Regularly Review and Update Security Policies: Regularly review and update security policies to ensure that they are up-to-date with the latest security standards and best practices. Conduct Regular Security Audits: Conduct regular security audits to identify vulnerabilities and areas of weakness in the SQL injection detection scheme and take steps to address them. In conclusion, developing an SQL injection detection scheme in video games involves implementing input validation, using prepared statements, monitoring database activity, implementing alerts and response mechanisms, regularly reviewing and updating security policies, and conducting regular security audits. By implementing a comprehensive SQL injection detection scheme, game developers can help protect their games and their players against SQL injection attacks.
4.6 RESULTS AND EVALUATION
4.6.1 Intrusion Detection
The results and evaluation of an intrusion detection method in video games will depend on the specific method used, the type of attack being targeted, and the dataset used for evaluation. However, there are some general steps that can be taken to evaluate the effectiveness of an intrusion detection method in video games: Test the Method on a Representative Dataset: The intrusion detection method should be tested on a representative dataset of video game traffic to evaluate its effectiveness in detecting attacks. The dataset should include a mix of normal traffic and traffic that contains known attacks. Measure Detection Rate and False Positive Rate: The detection rate and false positive rate of the intrusion detection method should be measured to evaluate its accuracy in detecting attacks. The detection rate is the percentage of attacks that are correctly detected, while the false positive rate is the percentage of normal traffic that is incorrectly flagged as an attack. 
 
Figure 4.5: Time of attack detection where T is the interaction time.
Evaluate Performance in Real-Time: The intrusion detection method should be evaluated for its performance in real-time to determine its ability to detect attacks in real-time. Compare Results to Other Methods: The results of the intrusion detection method should be compared to the results of other intrusion detection methods to evaluate its effectiveness compared to other methods. Consider Cost-Effectiveness: The cost-effectiveness of the intrusion detection method should be considered to determine whether it is a practical and cost-effective solution for the specific video game environment. Evaluate Scalability: The scalability of the intrusion detection method should be evaluated to determine its ability to handle large amounts of traffic and to be deployed across multiple game environments. In conclusion, the results and evaluation of an intrusion detection method in video games involve testing the method on a representative dataset, measuring the detection rate and false positive rate, evaluating performance in real-time, comparing results to other methods, considering cost-effectiveness, and evaluating scalability. By taking these steps, game developers can determine the effectiveness of an intrusion detection method and make informed decisions about its implementation in their games.
 
Figure 4.6: Assessment of game hackers based on their winning and losing rate.
4.6.2 Adding New Information
The results and evaluation of an SQL injection detection scheme in video games can be assessed by testing the system against a dataset of known SQL injection attacks and normal traffic to determine the accuracy of the system. Here are some steps that can be taken to evaluate the effectiveness of an SQL injection detection scheme in video games: Dataset Preparation: A dataset of known SQL injection attacks and normal traffic should be prepared. The dataset should include various types of attacks and normal traffic to test the system's ability to differentiate between legitimate traffic and malicious SQL injection attempts. 
Table 4.1: accuracy of SQL injection detection in various video games and web applications
■(" Web " @" Application " )	■(" \# Queries " @" Intercepted " )	TP	FN	FP	TN	TPR	FPR	Accuracy
Bookstore	4477	3862	52	6	557	98.67%	1.07%	98.70%
Forum	3580	2986	97	11	486	96.85%	2.21%	96.98%
Classifieds	1987	1587	21	7	372	98.69%	1.85%	98.59%
NewsPortal	1544	1223	54	2	265	95.77%	0.75%	96.37%
JobPortal	3114	2644	33	4	433	98.77%	0.92%	98.81%
Testing: The SQL injection detection scheme should be tested on the prepared dataset to evaluate its effectiveness in detecting SQL injection attacks. The system should be evaluated based on metrics such as true positives, false positives, true negatives, and false negatives. Evaluation: The evaluation should focus on the system's ability to detect SQL injection attacks and differentiate them from legitimate traffic. The evaluation should also consider the system's false positive and false negative rates. Comparison: The results of the evaluation should be compared to the performance of other SQL injection detection schemes to determine the effectiveness of the system relative to other solutions. Optimization: Based on the evaluation results, the system can be optimized to improve its performance and reduce false positives and false negatives. Deployment: Once the system has been evaluated and optimized, it can be deployed in a live environment to monitor for SQL injection attacks. In conclusion, the results and evaluation of an SQL injection detection scheme in video games involve dataset preparation, testing, evaluation, comparison, optimization, and deployment. By taking these steps, game developers can determine the effectiveness of the system and make informed decisions about its implementation in their games.
CONCLUSION AND FUTURE WORKS
5.1 CONCLUSION
Cybersecurity is an essential aspect of any online game as it ensures that player data is protected from unauthorized access and exploitation. In this context, cybersecurity refers to the practice of protecting the game's infrastructure, data, and users from cyber threats such as hacking, malware, and other forms of malicious activity. One of the main challenges in ensuring cybersecurity in games is that the game must remain accessible and enjoyable for players, while at the same time, protecting their information and preventing cheating or other forms of unfair play. To achieve this balance, game developers need to implement various security measures such as encryption, two-factor authentication, and secure login protocols. Another important aspect of cybersecurity in games is ensuring that players are aware of potential risks and how to protect themselves from them. This can involve educating players on how to create strong passwords, how to recognize phishing scams, and how to avoid downloading malware. Overall, cybersecurity is a critical consideration for any online game, and developers must take proactive measures to protect players' data and ensure a safe and enjoyable gaming experience
The size and scope of today's video game industry are both impressive. There is constant movement in the business world, with startups appearing, growing, and sometimes even folding. Worries about information technology security affect every company in the video game industry. Each of these businesses can keep up with the security and infrastructure requirements of the modern video game industry by developing and implementing an appropriate enterprise security plan.  Most game studios should be able to use the provided information as a springboard for developing and implementing a security strategy tailored to their unique needs. Each and every security strategy is a work in progress, including this one.  Although the data in this article is accurate as of the time of publication, it is possible that some of the discussed components will require replacement or upgrading in the following year. Existing security protocols are updated, new hardware is developed and acquired, new software is written, and even new businesses are acquired.  The video game industry is no exception to the rule that progress and alteration occur in the world at large.  Each company will be stronger in the long run if its security issues and controls are addressed and implemented today. 
In this dissertation, we take into account the fact that the proposed framework includes organizations that operate within the law as well as those that operate outside of the law. When malicious users are present, the veracity of cyber educational games can be put in jeopardy, and as a result, the regular organizations that make up the framework could be damaged as a direct result of this. We model the issue as a game with only partial information and outcomes that are either zero or positive. We make the assumption in the game's design that our method uses machine learning to perform anomaly detection on all incoming data in order to identify any potential threats that do not fit a predefined pattern. This allows it to identify any potential threats that do not fit the pattern. Because of this, the proposed method is able to recognize any potential dangers that do not conform to the pattern.  Following this, we run a simulation of the game at its Nash equilibrium, which produces a game with a number of different strategies that are still viable options. An analysis of the results of the simulation is then used to determine the best response strategies that companies can use to experiment with in order to maximize the payoffs they receive. This is done in order to achieve the maximum possible benefit from the simulation. By utilizing the findings of the response strategy analysis that was discussed earlier, we are able to determine the most productive course of action that should be taken with regard to the proposed model. Because of this, we are in a position to make certain that the proposed method and other lawful enterprises, despite the existence of dishonest competitors, are able to continue to thrive and be successful.
5.2 FUTURE WORKS
Developing a cyber security educational game is an ongoing process, and there are several future recommendations that can help ensure the game remains effective and relevant: 
	Keep the game up-to-date: The cyber security landscape is constantly evolving, with new threats and vulnerabilities emerging all the time. To ensure the game remains relevant and effective, it is important to regularly update its content and incorporate the latest cyber security trends and best practices. 
	Promote collaboration and community engagement: Cyber security is a collective responsibility, and it is important to foster a sense of community and collaboration among players. This can be achieved by incorporating social features into the game, such as forums, leaderboards, and online chat, and encouraging players to share their experiences and knowledge with others. 
	Consider different learning styles: People have different learning styles, and it is important to consider this when developing educational content. The game should incorporate different types of activities and challenges that appeal to a range of learning styles, such as visual, auditory, and kinaesthetic. 
	Encourage continued learning: Cyber security is a complex and constantly changing field, and there is always more to learn. The game should be designed to encourage players to continue learning beyond the game itself, by providing links to additional resources and training opportunities. 
	Incorporate real-world scenarios: Cyber security threats can have real-world consequences, and incorporating real-world scenarios into the game can help players better understand the importance of cyber security and the potential risks of not taking it seriously. 
By incorporating these future recommendations, the cyber security educational game can remain effective and relevant, and continue to contribute to a safer and more secure online environment.







